Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-1646
Enforceability of contracts and evidence of indebtedness.

No note, instrument, or other evidence of indebtedness or contract relating to payment for education or educational services shall be enforceable in the courts of this state by (1) any private postsecondary career school operating in this state unless the school has received authorization to operate or (2) any private postsecondary career school having an agent or agents in this state unless any and all agents who enrolled or sought to enroll the person to whom such services were to be rendered or to whom educational credentials were to be granted had an agent's permit at the time of their contract with such person.

Laws 1977, LB 486, § 50;

Laws 1990, LB 488, § 45;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-2850;

Laws 1995, LB 4, § 46.